Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-221
Injuring or obstructing watercourse, drain, or ditch; penalty; liability for costs of cleaning.

If any person or persons shall willfully fill up, injure or destroy any watercourse or any drain or ditch constructed as herein required, or willfully prevent or delay the construction or repair of any watercourse or any drain or ditch in the manner provided by sections 31-201 to 31-223, such person or persons shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars, or be confined in the county jail not to exceed thirty days, and in addition thereto may be liable for the cost of cleaning out any such watercourse, drain, or ditch as determined by the court.

Laws 1911, c. 142, § 17, p. 473;

R.S.1913, § 1791;

C.S.1922, § 1738;

C.S.1929, § 31-321;

R.S.1943, § 31-221;

Laws 1965, c. 156, § 5, p. 503.